District of Columbia statutes.
4-754.36

Termination.

(a)

A provider may terminate its delivery of services to a client only when:

(1)

The provider documents that it has considered suspending the client in accordance with § 4-754.35 or has made a reasonable effort, in light of the severity of the act or acts leading to the termination, to transfer the client in accordance with § 4-754.34;

(2)

The client:

(A)

Possesses a weapon on the provider’s premises;

(B)

Possesses or sells illegal drugs on the provider’s premises;

(C)

Assaults or batters any person on the provider’s premises;

(D)

Endangers the client’s own safety or the safety of others on the provider’s premises;

(E)

Intentionally or maliciously vandalizes, destroys, or steals the property of any person on the provider’s premises;

(F)

Fails to accept an offer of appropriate permanent housing or supportive housing that better serves the client’s needs after having been offered 2 appropriate permanent or supportive housing opportunities; or

(G)

Knowingly engages in repeated violations of a provider’s Program Rules; and

(3)

In the case of a termination pursuant to paragraph (2)(F) or (G) of this subsection, the provider has made reasonable efforts to help the client overcome obstacles to obtaining permanent housing.

(b)

For the purposes of subsection (a)(2)(F) of this section, Rapid Re-Housing shall be considered an offer of supportive housing and an offer of 2 different units through a Rapid Re-Housing program shall be considered 2 offers of supportive housing. In determining whether an offer of permanent or supportive housing is appropriate, the results of a research- or evidence-based assessment tool used as part of the decision to make such an offer shall be given great weight.

History

Oct. 22, 2005, D.C. Law 16-35, § 22, 52 DCR 8113
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 5182(g), 60 DCR 12472

Section References

This section is referenced in § 4-754.34 and § 4-754.35.

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 rewrote the section.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5182(g) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 5182(g) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 5181 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle Q of Title V of the act may be cited as the “Homeless Services Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.